Massachusetts, session 194th, S744.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Paragraph Twenty Sixth (h) of Section 7 of Chapter 4 of the General Laws,
as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after the word
"person;" the following words:- except that this subparagraph shall not apply to proposals and
bids as described herein as made or received by the group insurance commission.
SECTION 2. Section 7 of Chapter 4 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 194, after the word "person;" the
following words:- except that this subparagraph shall not apply to proposals and bids as
described herein as made or received by the group insurance commission.
of 1